Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.065

License—Information contained.

The license shall state the address at which the business is to be conducted and shall state fully the name of the licensee, and if the licensee is a copartnership or association, the names of its members, and if a corporation, the date and place of its incorporation. The license is not transferable or assignable.

[ 2012 c 17 s 3; 1991 c 208 s 7.]